Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5703.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 9 of Chapter 105 of the 1990 Public Laws entitled "An Act to
Incorporate the Kingston Water District," as amended by Chapter 38 of the 2008 Public Laws and
Chapter 34 of the 2011 Public Laws entitled "An Act Relating to the Kingston Water District –
Bonds," is hereby further amended to read as follows:
Section 9. For the purpose of raising money to carry the provisions of this act into effect,
said district is hereby authorized and empowered from time to time to borrow not exceeding the
sum of four million dollars ($4,000,000) fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) and to issue its notes
and/or bonds therefor, and to renew any such notes and/or bonds from time to time as the same
become due. All moneys raised by the authority hereof shall be exclusively used and expended for
said purpose. The said district at any regular annual meeting or at any special meeting, the notice
for which contained notice of intention to act upon the issuance of bonds, shall cause any bonds
issued by authority hereof to be issued for such time, on such terms and in such amounts, not to
exceed said sum of four million dollars ($4,000,000) fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000), as shall
be fixed by vote of its qualified electors; and after any issue of any such bonds, said district shall
annually appropriate, so long as such bonds are outstanding, a sum to pay interest and principal or
sinking fund installments thereon.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001706
========
LC001706 - Page 2 of 3